California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 374, no local publicly owned electric utility or other governmental entity shall provide partial or full electric service to a retail customer of an electrical corporation unless the customer of that electrical corporation first confirms in writing an obligation to pay, through tariff or otherwise, to the electrical corporation currently providing electric service, a nonbypassable generation-related transition charge established by the regulatory body for that electrical corporation. The charge shall be paid directly to the electrical corporation providing electricity in the service area in which the consumer is located.

(c) No local publicly owned electric utility or electrical corporation shall sell electric power to the retail customers of another local publicly owned electric utility or electrical corporation unless the first utility has agreed to allow the second utility to make sales of electric power to the retail customers of the first utility.

(d) This section does not apply to an exchange of customers affected by a local publicly owned electric utility completing a mutually agreeable condemnation process to resolve a fringe area agreement in which there exists a balance of benefits between the customers of the local publicly owned electric utility and the electrical corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9602.

(a) After a public hearing, the local regulatory body of each local publicly owned electric utility shall determine whether it will authorize direct transactions between electricity suppliers and end use customers, subject to implementation of the nonbypassable severance fee or transition charge referred to in Section 9603.

(b) If the regulatory body authorizes direct transactions, a phase-in of these transactions shall commence no later than the latter of January 1, 2000, or two years after the start of the phase-in of direct transactions by the electrical corporations pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 365, and shall be completed by the later of December 31, 2010, or two years after the completion of the phase-in by electrical corporations.

(c) The regulatory body shall develop a phase-in schedule at the conclusion of which all customers shall have the right to engage in direct transactions.

(d) Any phase-in of customer eligibility for direct transactions ordered by the regulatory body shall be equitable to all customer classes.

(e) If the regulatory body does not authorize direct access as contemplated in this section, then the publicly owned electric utility shall not be eligible to recover the nonbypassable charge as provided in Section 9603.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 12.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9603.

(a) Not less than six months prior to the date of implementation of direct transactions, the regulatory body shall establish the nonbypassable generation-related severance fee or transition charge which shall include, but shall not be limited to, employee related transition costs incurred and projected for severance, out placement, retraining, early retirement, and related expenses for employees directly affected by restructuring.

(b) The regulatory body of a local publicly owned electric utility, prior to adopting any generation related severance fee or transition charge, shall make available for public review the basis for the severance fee or transition charge and shall hold at least one public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 12.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9604.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Direct transaction” means a contract between one or more electric generators, marketers, or brokers, public or private, of electric power and one or more retail customers providing for the purchase and sale of electric power and ancillary services.

(b) “Service area” means an area in which, as of December 20, 1995, an investor-owned electric utility or a local publicly owned electric utility was obligated to provide service.

(c) “Severance fee” or “transition charge” for a local publicly owned electric utility shall mean that charge or periodic charge assessed to customers to recover the reasonable uneconomic portion of costs associated with generation-related assets and obligations, nuclear decommissioning, and capitalized energy efficiency investment programs approved prior to August 15, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 558, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

9605.

(a) This division and Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 330) of Part 1 of Division 1 do not affect preexisting ratemaking authority of a regulatory body of any local publicly owned electric utility.

(b) This division does not modify or abrogate any agreement, or any rights or obligations in any such agreement, between retail electric service providers relating to service areas.

(c) This division does not limit or affect the statutory rights of a local publicly owned electric utility to negotiate and design rates for existing customers and new customers not choosing to be served by an alternate supplier.

(d) This division does not limit electric supply options within the service territory of a local publicly owned electric utility to the extent the options are of the nature specified in Section 218 as it existed on December 20, 1995, with the exception of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of that section, and the imposition of a severance fee or transition charge on customers electing those options shall be prohibited whether the elections are made before or after the availability of direct transactions within the service area of the local publicly owned electric utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 221.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9606.

All city-owned electric utilities shall report on the periodic bill the amount expected to be transferred from the utility to the general fund, and to any special funds, of the city on a no less than annual basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 628, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9607.

(a) The intent of this section is to avoid cost-shifting to customers of an electrical corporation resulting from the transfer of distribution services from an electrical corporation to an irrigation district.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section and Section 9608, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, an irrigation district that offered electrical service to retail customers as of January 1, 1999, may not construct, lease, acquire, install, or operate facilities for the distribution or transmission of electricity to retail customers located in the service territory of an electrical corporation providing electrical distribution services, unless the district has first applied for and received the approval
 of the commission and implements its service consistent with the commission’s order. The commission shall find that service to be in the public interest and shall approve the request of a district to provide distribution or transmission of electricity to retail customers located in the service territory of an electrical corporation providing electrical distribution service if, after notice and hearing, the commission determines all of the following:

(1) The district will provide universal service to all retail customers who request service within the area to be served, at published tariff rates and on a just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory basis, comparable to that provided by the current retail service provider.

(2) If the area the district is proposing to serve is either of the following:

(A) Is within the
 district’s boundaries but less than the entire district, the area to be served includes a percentage of residential customers and small customers, based on load, comparable to the percentage of residential and small customers in the district, based on load.

(B) Includes territory outside the district’s boundaries, in which case the territory outside the district’s boundaries must include a percentage of residential customers and small customers, based on load, comparable to the percentage of residential and small customers in the county or counties where service is to be provided, based on load.

(3) Service by the district will be consistent with the intent of the state to avoid economic waste caused by duplication of facilities as set forth in Section 8101.

(4) Service by the district will include reasonable
 mitigation of any adverse effects on the reliability of an existing service by the electrical corporation.

(5) The district has established, funded, and is carrying out public purpose and low-income programs comparable to those provided by the current electric retail service provider.

(6) That district’s tariffed electrical service rates, exclusive of commodity costs, will be at least 15 percent below the tariffed electrical service rates, exclusive of commodity costs and nonbypassable charges under Sections 367, 368, 375, 376, and 379, of the electrical corporation for comparable services.

(7) Service by the district is in the public interest.

(c) An irrigation district that obtains the approval of the commission under this section to serve an area
 shall prepare an annual report available to the public on the total load and number of accounts of residential, low-income, agricultural, commercial, and industrial customers served by the irrigation district in the approved service area.

(d) The commission shall have jurisdiction to resolve and adjudicate complaint cases brought against an irrigation district that offered electrical service to retail customers as of January 1, 1999, by an interested party where the complaint concerns retail electric service outside the boundaries of the district and within the service territory of an electrical corporation. Nothing in this section grants the commission jurisdiction to adjudicate complaint cases involving retail electrical service by an irrigation district inside its boundaries or inside an irrigation district’s exclusive service territory.

(e) Any project involving electrical
 transmission or distribution facilities to be constructed or installed by an irrigation district to serve retail customers located in the service territory of an electrical corporation providing electrical distribution services shall comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code). The county in which the construction or installation is to occur shall act as the lead agency. If a project involves the construction or installation of electrical transmission or distribution facilities in more than one county, the county where the majority of the construction is anticipated to occur shall act as the lead agency.

(f) An irrigation district may not offer service to customers outside of its district boundaries before offering service to all customers within its district boundaries.

(g) This section does not
 apply to electrical distribution service provided by the Modesto Irrigation District to those customers or within those areas described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 9610.

(h) The provisions of this section shall not apply to (1) a cumulative 90 megawatts of load served by the Merced Irrigation District that is located within the boundaries of the district, as those boundaries existed on December 20, 1995, together with the territory of Castle Air Force Base that was located outside the district on that date, or (2) electric load served by the district that was not previously served by an electrical corporation that is located within the boundaries of the district, as those boundaries existed on December 20, 1995, together with the territory of Castle Air Force Base that was located outside the district on that date.

(i) For purposes of this section, a megawatt of
 load shall be calculated in accordance with the methodology established by the Energy Commission in its Docket No. 96-IRR-1890, but the 90 megawatts shall not include electrical usage by customers that move to the areas described in paragraph (1) after December 31, 2000.

(j) Subdivision (a) of this section shall not apply to the construction, modification, lease, acquisition, installation, or operation of facilities for the distribution or transmission of electricity to customers electrically connected to a district as of December 31, 2000, or to other customers who subsequently locate at the same premises.

(k) In recognition of contractual arrangements and settlements existing as of June 1, 2000, this section does not apply to the acquisition or operation of the electrical distribution facilities that are the subject of the Settlement Agreement dated May 1, 2000, between Pacific
 Gas and Electric Company and the San Joaquin Irrigation District.

(l) For purposes of this section, retail customers do not include an irrigation district’s own electric load being served at retail by an electrical corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 51.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9608.

Sections 454.1 and 9607 of this code and Section 56133 of the Government Code do not apply to an irrigation district with respect to an area to be served by the irrigation district, if all of the following occur:

(a) The irrigation district acquires substantially all the electric distribution facilities and related subtransmission facilities of any electrical corporation that has an obligation to provide electric distribution service within the area to be served by the irrigation district.

(b) The commission approves a service area agreement between the irrigation district and the electrical corporation pursuant to Sections 8101 to 8108, inclusive, which service area agreement provides that the electrical corporation may not provide electric distribution service in the area to be served by the irrigation district and that the irrigation district may not provide electric distribution service in the remainder of the electrical corporation’s service territory.

(c) The commission relieves the electrical corporation of its obligation to serve within the area to be served by the irrigation district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 176.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9610.

Commencing on January 1, 2001, and continuing through December 31, 2025, inclusive, all of the following shall apply:

(a) An electrical corporation may not provide electric transmission or distribution service to retail customers in either of the following areas:

(1) The Modesto Irrigation District electric service area as defined in the August 15, 1940, Purchase of Properties agreement between Modesto Irrigation District and Pacific Gas and Electric Company.

(2) The Mountain House Community Services District as defined in the master specific plan adopted by the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Joaquin on November 10, 1994.

(b) (1) Within the purchase zone as described in Exhibit “B” of The Asset Sale Agreement By and Between Pacific Gas and Electric Company and Modesto Irrigation District Dated July 23, 1997, contained in Public Utilities Commission Application Number 97-07-030, Pacific Gas and Electric Company and Modesto Irrigation District may each provide electric transmission and distribution service to retail customers. The area described in this subdivision shall be considered to be within both Pacific Gas and Electric Company’s and Modesto Irrigation District’s electric service area.

(2) The Legislature recognizes that electrical corporations and irrigation districts may each construct infrastructure, and that the infrastructure may, in some cases, be duplicative. In those cases, the Legislature encourages irrigation districts and electrical corporations to enter into agreements pursuant to Sections 8101 to 8108, inclusive, where those agreements further the interests of the state as set forth in Section 8101.

(c) Modesto Irrigation District may provide up to 8 megawatts of peak sales to Contra Costa Water District for delivery to its Old River Intake Facility and Rock Slough Pumping Plant.

(d) Except as provided in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), Modesto Irrigation District may not provide electric transmission or distribution service to retail customers in the territory of Pacific Gas and Electric Company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 177.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9611.

Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56100) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code does not apply to electric service provided by the Modesto Irrigation District within the geographic areas described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 9610.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1042, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9612.

The Legislature finds and declares that the policies stated in Section 8101 to 8108, inclusive, would be furthered and that it would be in the best interests of the state, and not incompatible with the public interest, if an agreement embodying the provisions of Section 9610 were to be approved by the commission. The Legislature hereby encourages the Pacific Gas and Electric Company and Modesto Irrigation District to agree on the terms of an agreement embodying the provisions of Section 9610, and encourages the commission to approve that agreement to the extent that the agreement is consistent with the policies of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1042, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9614.

(a) Beginning January 15, 2002, and at least once monthly thereafter, a local publicly owned electric utility shall notify each air pollution control district and air quality management district of the name and address of each entity within the district’s boundaries within the local publicly owned electric utility’s control or service area with whom the utility enters into an interruptible service contract or similar arrangement.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “interruptible service contract or similar arrangement” means any arrangement in which a nonresidential electrical customer agrees to reduce or consider reducing its electrical
 consumption during periods of peak demand or at the request of the local publicly owned electric utility in exchange for compensation, or for assurances not to be blacked out or other similar nonmonetary assurances.

(c) The local air pollution control district or air quality management district shall maintain in a confidential manner the information received pursuant to this section. However, nothing in this subdivision shall affect the applicability of Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, or of any other similar open records statute or ordinance, to information provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 402.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

9615.

Each local publicly owned electric utility, in procuring energy to serve the load of its retail end-use customers, shall first acquire all available energy efficiency and demand reduction resources that are cost effective, reliable, and feasible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 17.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9616.

(a) To the extent that doing so is cost effective, a local publicly owned electric utility providing electric service to 250,000 or more customers within the Los Angeles Basin shall maximize the use of demand response, renewable energy resources, and energy efficiency to reduce demand in the area where electrical reliability has been impacted as a result of reductions in gas storage capacity and gas deliverability resulting from the well failure at the Aliso Canyon natural gas storage facility first reported to the commission in October 2015.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Los Angeles Basin” means the area identified as the “Aliso Canyon Delivery Area” on page 11 of the Aliso Canyon Risk Assessment Technical Report, dated April 5,
 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 814, Sec. 4.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9618.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a local publicly owned electric utility that provides electric service to 250,000 or more customers within the Los Angeles Basin shall make publicly available, upon request of any person, electrical grid data necessary or useful to enable distributed energy resource providers to target solutions that support reliability in the area where electrical reliability has been impacted as a result of reductions in gas storage capacity and gas deliverability resulting from the well failure at the Aliso Canyon natural gas storage facility first reported to the commission in October 2015.

(2) A local publicly owned electric utility
 shall not make data available pursuant to paragraph (1) that is prohibited from being disclosed pursuant to state or federal law.

(3) The data made available pursuant to this subdivision shall be available pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), commencing within 60 days of the effective date of this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Los Angeles Basin” means the area identified as the “Aliso Canyon Delivery Area” on page 11 of the Aliso Canyon Risk Assessment Technical Report, dated April 5, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 403.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

9620.

(a) Each local publicly owned electric utility serving end-use customers shall prudently plan for and procure resources that are adequate to meet its planning reserve margin and peak demand and operating reserves, sufficient to provide reliable electric service to its customers. Customer generation located on the customer’s site or providing electric service through arrangements authorized by Section 218, shall not be subject to these requirements if the customer generation, or the load it serves, meets one of the following criteria:

(1) It takes standby service from the local publicly owned electric utility on a rate schedule that provides for adequate backup planning and operating reserves for the standby customer class.

(2) It is not physically interconnected to the electric transmission or distribution grid, so that, if the customer generation fails, backup power is not supplied from the electricity grid.

(3) There is physical assurance that the load served by the customer generation will be curtailed concurrently and commensurately with an outage of the customer generation.

(b) Each local publicly owned electric utility serving end-use customers shall, at a minimum, meet the most recent minimum planning reserve and reliability criteria approved by the Board of Trustees of the Western Systems Coordinating Council or the Western Electricity Coordinating Council.

(c) Each local publicly owned electric utility shall prudently plan for and procure energy storage systems that
 are adequate to meet the requirements of Section 2836.

(d) A local publicly owned electric utility serving end-use customers shall, upon request, provide the Energy Commission with any information the Energy Commission determines is necessary to evaluate the progress made by the local publicly owned electric utility in meeting the requirements of this section, consistent with the annual targets established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25310 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) The Energy Commission shall report to the Legislature, to be included in each integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302 of the Public Resources Code, regarding the progress made by each local publicly owned electric utility serving end-use customers in meeting the requirements of this section.

(f) A local
 publicly owned electric utility may meet its minimum planning reserve margin through individual contractual procurement or through an aggregated or pooled portfolio of resources if that aggregation or pooling is defined in a contractual arrangement and each participating local publicly owned electric utility meets its individual minimum planning reserve margin based on its share of the resource portfolio pool.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 11.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9621.

(a) This section shall apply to a local publicly owned electric utility with an annual electrical demand exceeding 700 gigawatthours, as determined on a three-year average commencing January 1, 2013.

(b) On or before January 1, 2019, the governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility shall adopt an integrated resource plan and a process for updating the plan at least once every five years to ensure the utility achieves all of the following:

(1) Meets the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established by the State Air Resources Board, in coordination with the commission and the Energy Commission, for the
 electricity sector and each local publicly owned electric utility that reflect the electricity sector’s percentage in achieving the economywide greenhouse gas emissions reductions of 40 percent from 1990 levels by 2030.

(2) Ensures procurement of at least 50 percent eligible renewable energy resources by 2030 consistent with Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1.

(3) Meets the goals specified in subparagraphs (D) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 454.52, and the goal specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 454.52, as that goal is applicable to each local publicly owned electric utility. A local publicly owned electric utility shall not, solely by reason of this
 paragraph, be subject to requirements otherwise imposed on electrical corporations.

(4) In furtherance of the carbon neutrality goals set forth in Executive Order B-55-18 To Achieve Carbon Neutrality (September 10, 2018), each updated integrated resource plan shall include, as applicable, details of the utility’s electrical service rate design that support transportation
 electrification, and existing or planned incentives to support transportation electrification, including rebates. The rate design shall include details for all applicable transportation sectors, including, but not limited to, on-road and off-road vehicles in the light-, medium-, and heavy-duty
 sectors. Each integrated resource plan shall also include information about the utility’s customer education and outreach efforts being implemented to inform utility customers of available incentives and decisionmaking tools, such as cost calculators or cost estimates that can assist customers in predicting the cost of paying for electricity for these vehicles.

(c) In furtherance of the requirements of subdivision (b), the governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility shall consider the role of existing renewable generation, grid operational efficiencies, energy storage, and distributed energy resources, including energy efficiency, in helping to ensure each utility meets energy needs and reliability needs in hours to encompass the hour of peak demand of electricity, excluding demand met by variable renewable generation
 directly connected to a California balancing authority, as defined in Section 399.12, while reducing the need for new electricity generation resources and new transmission resources in achieving the state’s energy goals at the least cost to ratepayers.

(d) (1) The integrated resource plan shall address procurement for the following:

(A) Energy efficiency and demand response resources pursuant to Section 9615.

(B) Energy storage requirements pursuant to Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 2835) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(C) Transportation electrification.

(D) A diversified
 procurement portfolio consisting of both short-term and long-term electricity, electricity-related, and demand response products.

(E) The resource adequacy requirements established pursuant to Section 9620.

(2) (A) The governing board of the local publicly owned electric utility may authorize all source procurement that includes various resource types, including demand-side resources, supply side resources, and resources that may be either demand-side resources or supply side resources, to ensure that the local publicly owned electric utility procures the optimum resource mix that meets the objectives of subdivision (b).

(B) The governing board may authorize procurement of resource types
 that will reduce overall greenhouse gas emissions from the electricity sector and meet the other goals specified in subdivision (b), but due to the nature of the technology or fuel source may not compete favorably in price against other resources over the time period of the integrated resource plan.

(e) A local publicly owned electric utility shall satisfy the notice and public disclosure requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 399.30 with respect to any integrated resource plan or plan update it considers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 138, Sec. 1.   (SB 437)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9622.

(a) Integrated resource plans and plan updates adopted pursuant to Section 9621 shall be submitted to the Energy Commission.

(b) The Energy Commission shall review the integrated resource plans and plan updates. If the Energy Commission determines an integrated resource plan or plan update is inconsistent with the requirements of Section 9621, the Energy Commission shall provide recommendations to correct the deficiencies.

(c) The Energy Commission may adopt guidelines to govern the submission of information and data and reports needed to support the Energy Commission’s review of the utility’s integrated
 resource plan pursuant to this section at a publicly noticed meeting offering
 all interested parties an opportunity to comment. The Energy Commission shall provide written public notice of not less than 30 days for the initial adoption of guidelines and not less than 10 days for the subsequent adoption of substantive changes. Notwithstanding any other law, any guidelines adopted pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 36.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9625.

(a) In its relevant distribution planning process, a local publicly owned electric utility shall consider the fleet data produced by the Energy Commission pursuant to Section 25328 of the Public Resources Code, and other available data, to facilitate the readiness of their distribution systems to support the level of electric vehicle charging anticipated by Executive Orders No. B-48-18 and N-79-20, the Energy Commission’s integrated energy policy report adopted pursuant to Section 25302 of the Public Resources Code, the Energy Commission’s assessment prepared pursuant to Section 25229 of the Public Resources Code, and relevant State Air Resources Board regulations. The local publicly owned electric utility’s consideration
 shall also include, as applicable and available, other local plans related to electric vehicle charging, including air quality management plans, regional seaport plans, regional transportation plans, and sustainable communities strategies.

(b) A local publicly owned electric utility shall identify any distribution investments made pursuant to this section in its integrated resource plan adopted pursuant to Section 9621.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 354, Sec. 4.   (AB 2700)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. UTILITIES OWNED BY MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS [10001. - 10303.]



CHAPTER 1. Acquisition, Operation, and Sale of Utilities [10001. - 10303.]



  ARTICLE 1. Acquisition and Operation [10001. - 10014.]

10001.

“Public utility” as used in this article, means the supply of a municipal corporation alone or together with its inhabitants, or any portion thereof, with water, light, heat, power, sewage collection, treatment, or disposal for sanitary or drainage purposes, transportation of persons or property, means of communication, or means of promoting the public convenience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1112, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.5.

A municipal corporation that provides broadband Internet access services shall comply with the requirements of Article 12 (commencing with Section 53167) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 963, Sec. 6.   (AB 1999)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

Any municipal corporation may acquire, construct, own, operate, or lease any public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

The power to acquire and operate a public utility includes the power to complete, reconstruct, extend, change, enlarge, and repair a public utility acquired, constructed, owned, or operated by a municipality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

For the purpose set forth in Sections 10002 and 10003 a municipal corporation may acquire, own, control, sell, or exchange lands, easements, licenses, and rights of every nature within or without its corporate limits, and may operate a public utility within or without the corporate limits when necessary to supply the municipality, or its inhabitants or any portion thereof, with the service desired.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.5.

(a) Except as provided for in subdivision (b), any judicial action or proceeding against a municipal corporation that provides electric utility service, to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul an ordinance, resolution, or motion fixing or changing a rate or charge for an electric commodity or an electric service furnished by a municipal corporation and adopted on or after July 1, 2000, shall be commenced within 120 days of the effective date of that ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(b) This section does not apply to any judicial action or proceeding filed pursuant to Chapter 13.7 (commencing with Section 54999) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code to protest or challenge a rate or charge or to seek the refund of a capital facilities fee if the notice and disclosure requirements of Section 54999.35 of the Government Code have not been followed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 146, Sec. 5.   Effective July 21, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

Whenever, in the operation of a utility, a municipality develops an excess of water, light, heat, or power, over and above the amount which is necessary for the use of the municipality and its inhabitants, or such portion thereof as the legislative body of the municipality determines is to be supplied therewith, the municipality may sell, lease, or distribute the excess outside of its corporate limits.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

No lease of a public utility is valid for a period of more than 15 years, and all such leases shall be let to the highest bidder at public auction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

(a) Every public utility furnishing light, heat, or power shall expend no funds for advertising when such advertising encourages increased consumption of such services or commodities.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a public utility furnishing light, heat, or power from expending funds for advertising which encourages the more efficient operation of the public utility or for advertising which encourages the more efficient use of light, heat, or power, the conservation of energy or natural resources, or presents accurate information on the economical purchase, maintenance, or use of any appliance or device using light, heat, or power.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 194.)
-------------------------------------------

10009.

(a) This section applies if there is a landlord-tenant relationship between the residential occupants and the owner, manager, or operator of the dwelling.

(b) If a public utility furnishes individually metered residential light, heat, water, or power to residential occupants in a detached
 single-family dwelling, a multiunit residential structure, mobilehome park, or a permanent residential structure in a labor camp, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, and the owner, manager, or operator of the dwelling, structure, or park is the customer of record, the public utility shall make every good faith effort to inform the residential occupants, by means of written notice, when the account is in arrears, that service will be terminated in 10 days. The written notice shall further inform the residential occupants that they have the right to become customers of the public utility without being required to pay the amount due on the delinquent account. The notice shall be in English and in the languages listed in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(c) The public utility is not required to make service available to the residential occupants unless each residential occupant agrees to the terms and conditions of service, and meets the requirements of law and the public utility’s rules. However, if one or more of the residential occupants are willing and able to assume responsibility for the subsequent charges to the account to the satisfaction of the public utility, or if there is a physical means, legally available to the public utility, of selectively terminating service to those residential occupants who have not met the requirements of the public utility’s rules, the public utility shall make service available to the residential occupants who have met those requirements.

(d) If prior service for a period of time is a condition for establishing credit with the public utility, residence and proof of prompt payment of rent or other obligation acceptable to the public utility for that period of time is a satisfactory equivalent.

(e) Any residential occupant who becomes a customer of the public utility pursuant to this section whose periodic payments, such as rental payments, include charges for residential light, heat, water, or power, where these charges are not separately